hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Audio i video razdjelnici i sklopke > Koaksijalni razdjelnici i prekidači: Koaksijalni razdjelnici; Koaksijalni prekidači
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Avdio in video razdelilniki in preklopniki > Koaksialni razdelilniki in preklopniki: Koaksialni razdelilniki; Koaksialni preklopniki
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Divisores e comutadores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e chaves coaxiais: Divisores coaxiais; Chaves coaxiais
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Audio & Video Splitters & Switches > Coaxial Splitters & Switches: Coaxial Splitters; Coaxial Switches
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Rozbočovače a prepínače zvuku a videa > Koaxiálne rozdeľovače a prepínače: Koaxiálne rozdeľovače; Koaxiálne prepínače
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สวิตช์และตลับแยก AV > ตัวแยกและสวิตช์โคแอกเชียล: ตัวแยกสัญญาณโคแอกเชียล; สวิตช์โคแอกเชียล
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Splitter e interruttori audio e video > Splitter e switch coassiali: Splitter coassiali; Switch coassiali
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Splittere și comutatoare audio și video > Splittere și switch-uri coaxiale: Splittere coaxiale; Switch-uri coaxiale
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Audio- und Video-Splitter & -Switches > Koaxial-Splitter und -Switches: Koaxial-Splitter; Koaxial-Switches
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Garso ir vaizdo skirstytuvai ir jungikliai > Koaksialiniai skirstytuvai ir jungikliai: Koaksialiniai skirstytuvai; Koaksialiniai jungikliai
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > AV rozbočovače a přepínače > Koaxiální rozbočovače a přepínače: Koaxiální rozbočovače; Koaxiální přepínače
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Разветвители и коммутаторы аудио- и видеосигналов > Коаксиальные разветвители и переключатели: Коаксиальные разветвители; Коаксиальные переключатели
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > AVスプリッター・スイッチ > 同軸スプリッター・スイッチャー: 同軸スプリッター; 同軸スイッチャー
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Bộ chia và công tắc âm thanh và hình ảnh > Bộ tách và công tắc đồng trục: Bộ tách đồng trục; Công tắc đồng trục
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 音频和视频分配器和切换器 > 同轴分路器和切换器: 同轴分路器; 同轴切换器
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > AV-jakajat ja -kytkimet > Koaksiaalijakajat ja -kytkimet: Koaksiaalijakajat; Koaksiaalikytkimet
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ήχου & βίντεο > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ομοαξονικού: Διαχωριστές ομοαξονικού; Διακόπτες ομοαξονικού
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 오디오 및 비디오 스플리터/스위치 > 동축 스플리터 및 스위치: 동축 스플리터; 동축 스위치
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Lyd og video – fordelere og omskiftere > Koaksiale fordelere og omskiftere: Koaksiale fordelere; Koaksiale omskiftere
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do przesyłania obrazu i dźwięku > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki koaksjalne: Rozdzielacze koaksjalne; Przełączniki koaksjalne
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Audio- és videoelosztók és -kapcsolók > Koaxiális elosztók és kapcsolók: Koaxiális elosztók; Koaxiális kapcsolók
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Divisores y conmutadores de audio y vídeo > Divisores y conmutadores coaxiales: Divisores coaxiales; Conmutadores coaxiales
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > AV 分配器/切換器 > 同軸分配器與切換器: 同軸分配器; 同軸切換器
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kabeldelare och omkopplare för video och ljud > Koaxialfördelare och omkopplare: Koaxialfördelare; Koaxialomkopplare
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Аудио- и видеосплитери и превключватели > Коаксиални сплитери и превключватели: Коаксиални сплитери; Коаксиални превключватели
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Lyd- og videosplittere og -brytere > Koaksiale splittere og brytere: Koaksiale splittere; Koaksiale brytere
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Ses ve Görüntü Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları > Koaksiyel Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar: Koaksiyel Bölücüler; Koaksiyel Anahtarlar
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Répartiteurs et commutateurs audio et vidéo > Répartiteurs et commutateurs coaxiaux: Répartiteurs coaxiaux; Commutateurs coaxiaux
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Audio-/videosplitters en -schakelaars > Coaxiale splitters en switches: Coaxiale splitters; Coaxiale switches
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Splitters e interrutores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e comutadores coaxiais: Divisores coaxiais; Comutadores coaxiais